Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.135

Secured claim—Creditor's right.

If a creditor's claim is secured by any property of the decedent, this chapter does not affect the right of a creditor to realize on the creditor's security, whether or not the creditor presented the claim in the manner provided in RCW 11.40.070.

[ 1997 c 252 s 20.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.